District of Columbia statutes.
2-215.06

Repealed

Allocation of agency contracts to local minority enterprises; quarterly agency reports on contracts; Council review of goals.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 7, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-167, § 2(b), 29 DCR 4983
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-1146.
1973 Ed., § 1-856.
The functions of the Department of General Services were transferred, in part, to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984, and transferred, in part, to the Department of Administrative Services by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.